Oklahoma, session 2026, SB33.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 70 of Title 62, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The State Treasurer shall be authorized to issue a


transaction card to citizens of this state with the ability to make


purchases that are debited from the balance of deposits with a


bullion depository created by the Office of the State Treasurer or


contracted with other public or private entities operating a bullion


depository.

Req. No. 37 Page 1


B. Upon the creation of a depository or a contractual agreement


with an entity pursuant to subsection A of this section, the Office


of the State Treasurer shall:


1. Provide procedures for the sharing of account information


between the depository and the Treasurer upon consent of the account


holder; and


2. Develop a fee structure for both the depository and the


Treasurer, to be paid by the account holder, to utilize the service


provided by a bullion depository.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 70.1 of Title 62, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Deposits of gold and silver in the bullion depository and


transactions made using the transaction card issued by the State


Treasurer shall be considered legal tender, pursuant to the


authority vested upon this state in Section 10 of Article I of the


United States Constitution. Deposits of gold and silver in the


bullion depository shall not be considered a commodity. The


transfer, buying, or selling of gold and silver held in the


depository for transactions shall not be considered an exchange of a


commodity, and shall be considered an exchange of currency.


B. Account holders issued a transaction card may make


transactions debited against the value of gold and silver deposits


in the bullion depository.

Req. No. 37 Page 2


C. The State Treasurer may promulgate rules to implement the


provisions of this act.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-37 QD 12/16/2024 10:59:58 PM







































Req. No. 37 Page 3